Mississippi, session 2026, HB4142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Tramaine Wagner of Walthall County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Simple Robbery and Conspiracy to Commit Simple Robbery on January 11, 2007, in Walthall County, Mississippi, for which he was sentenced to serve eight (8) years for simple robbery and five (5) years for conspiracy to commit with both to run concurrently.  On September 9, 2007, he went to shock probation.  He violated the terms and conditions of his probation on March 20, 2008; and was ordered and adjudged one (1) year of previously suspended time with the remainder suspended for five (5) years under Post Release Supervision.  On February 11, 2009, he was placed in Earned Release Supervision; and was discharged on March 20, 2009.  He violated the terms and conditions of his Post Release Supervision on November 12, 2009, causing his previously suspended time to be revoked and he was required to serve three (3) years of previously suspended time in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections (MDOC).  He was placed on Earned Release Supervision on October 13, 2010; and was discharged on February 12, 2011.  On December 14, 2011, he violated the terms and conditions of his Post Release Supervision and was remanded to the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections to serve his sentence.  He was discharged on June 9, 2015.  On September 12, 2017, he was sentenced to serve six (6) years with five (5) years and nine (9) months suspended, five (5) years under the supervision of MDOC, ninety (90) days in Walthall County Jail to be served on forty-five (45) consecutive weekends.  He was sentenced to probation on October 9, 2017. He was released from probation on July 12, 2022.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.